Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-604] Issuance of certificate of
self-insurance. The commissioner shall issue a certificate of
self-insurance if:

(1) The applicant has provided the bond, cash, or
securities and proof of qualification as a self-insurer affording security substantially
equivalent to that afforded under a motor vehicle insurance policy; and

(2) The commissioner is satisfied that in case of
injury, death, or property damage, any claimant would have the same rights
against the self-insurer as the claimant would have had if a motor vehicle
insurance policy was applicable. [L 2000, c 24, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next